Utah statutes.
76-6-409.1.   Devices for theft of services -- Seizure and destruction --
Civil actions for damages.
(1)  A person may not knowingly:
(a)  make or possess any instrument, apparatus, equipment, or device for the
use of, or for the purpose of, committing or attempting to commit theft under
Section 76-6-409 or 76-6-409.3; or
(b)  sell, offer to sell, advertise, give, transport, or otherwise transfer to
another any information, instrument, apparatus, equipment, or device, or any
information, plan, or instruction for obtaining, making, or assembling the
same, with intent that it be used, or caused to be used, to commit or attempt
to commit theft under Section 76-6-409 or 76-6-409.3.
(2) (a)  Any information, instrument, apparatus, equipment, or device, or
information, plan, or instruction referred to in Subsection (1) may be seized
pursuant to a court order, lawful search and seizure, lawful arrest, or other
lawful process.
(b)  Upon the conviction of any person for a violation of any provision of
this section, any information, instrument, apparatus, equipment, device, plan,
or instruction shall be destroyed as contraband by the sheriff of the county
in which the person was convicted.
(3)  A person who violates any provision of Subsection (1) or (2) is guilty of
a class A misdemeanor.
(4)  Criminal prosecutions under this section do not affect any person's right
of civil action for redress for damages suffered as a result of any violation
of this section.
